src/import/noninflecting_adjectives.lexc
@P.Case.Ine@lukkus+A:@P.Case.Ine@l´ukkus GI ;
lukustamata+A:lukustamata GI ;
lumega+A:lumega GI ;
lumeta+A:lumeta GI ;
lumikatteta+A:lumi#k´atteta GI ;
lõpetamata+A:lõpetamata GI ;
lõputa+A:lõputa GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@lõõgas+A:@P.Case.Ine@l´õõgas GI ;
läbikaalumata+A:läbi#k´aalumata GI ;
läbimõtlemata+A:läbi#m´õtlemata GI ;
läbisegamini+A:läbi#segamini GI ;
läikega+A:l´äikega GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@längakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@längakil GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@längus+A:@P.Case.Ine@l´ängus GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@lääbakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@lääbakil GI ;
läägevõitu+A:l´ääge#v´õitu GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@lääpas+A:@P.Case.Ine@l´ääpas GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@lömakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@lömakil GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@lömmis+A:@P.Case.Ine@l´ömmis GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@lösakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@lösakil GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@lössakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@lössakil GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@lössis+A:@P.Case.Ine@l´ös,sis GI ;
lühikesevõitu+A:lühikese#v´õitu GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@lüngis+A:@P.Case.Ine@l´üngis GI ;
mainimisväärt+A:m´ainimis#v´äärt GI ;
maksakarva+A:maksa#k´arva GI ;
maksuga+A:maksuga GI ;
maksuta+A:maksuta GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@marraskil+A:@P.Case.Ine@marraskil GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@marus+A:@P.Case.Ine@marus GI ;
meelemõistuseta+A:meele#m´õistuseta GI ;
meelemärkuseta+A:meele#m´ärkuseta GI ;
@P.Case.Short@mega+A:@P.Case.Short@mega GI ;
mehemoodi+A:mehe#m´ood,i GI ;
meiesorti+A:meie#s´orti GI ;
merekarva+A:mere#k´arva GI ;
miinusmärgiga+A:miinus#märgiga GI ;
minusorti+A:minu#s´orti GI ;
missorti+A:m´is#s´orti GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@molukil+A:@P.Case.Ine@mol,ukil GI ;
monoküllastamata+A:mono#küllastamata GI ;
moodi+A:m´ood,i GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@morssis+A:@P.Case.Ine@m´orssis GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@mossis+A:@P.Case.Ine@m´os,sis GI ;
motiveerimata+A:motiv´eerimata GI ;
mugavuseta+A:mugavuseta GI ;
mullavärvi+A:mulla#v´ärvi GI ;
muredeta+A:muredeta GI ;
murega+A:murega GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@mures+A:@P.Case.Ine@mures GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@musklis+A:@P.Case.Ine@m´usklis GI ;
mustakirju+A:musta#k´irju GI ;
mustriga+A:m´ustriga GI ;
muusikaandega+A:muusika#´andega GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@mõlkis+A:@P.Case.Ine@m´õl,kis GI ;
mõnudeta+A:mõnudeta GI ;
mõradega+A:mõradega GI ;
mõruvõitu+A:mõru#v´õitu GI ;
mõtlemata+A:m´õtlemata GI ;
märgistamata+A:märgistamata GI ;
märjavõitu+A:märja#v´õitu GI ;
määramata+A:m´ääramata GI ;
määratlemata+A:määratlemata GI ;
mööda+A:m´ööda GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@naerukil+A:@P.Case.Ine@naerukil GI ;
naerul+A:naerul GI ;
nahast+A:nahast GI ;
naitumiseas+A:n´aitumis#´eas GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@naksis+A:@P.Case.Ine@n´aksis GI ;
napivõitu+A:napi#v´õitu GI ;
narrivõitu+A:narri#v´õitu GI ;
nendesorti+A:nende#s´orti GI ;
nigelavõitu+A:nigela#v´õitu GI ;
niiskevõitu+A:n´iiske#v´õitu GI ;
nimega+A:nimega GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@nipsis+A:@P.Case.Ine@n´ipsis GI ;
nisukarva+A:nisu#k´arva GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@nohus+A:@P.Case.Ine@nohus GI ;
noorevõitu+A:noore#v´õitu GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@norgus+A:@P.Case.Ine@n´orgus GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@normis+A:@P.Case.Ine@normis GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@norus+A:@P.Case.Ine@norus GI ;
norutujus+A:noru#tujus GI ;
nukravõitu+A:n´ukra#v´õitu GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@nuppus+A:@P.Case.Ine@n´uppus GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@nõres+A:@P.Case.Ine@nõres GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@nõtkus+A:@P.Case.Ine@n´õtkus GI ;
nägemata+A:nägemata GI ;
nägemiseta+A:nägemiseta GI ;
nägemisväärt+A:nägemis#v´äärt GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@näljas+A:@P.Case.Ine@näl,jas GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@närvis+A:@P.Case.Ine@n´ärvis GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@nässis+A:@P.Case.Ine@näs,sis GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@nässus+A:@P.Case.Ine@n´ässus GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@ohus+A:@P.Case.Ine@ohus GI ;
olenemata+A:olenemata GI ;
omapärata+A:oma#pärata GI ;
ootamata+A:´ootamata GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@ootusärevil+A:@P.Case.Ine@´ootus#ärevil GI ;
orasekarva+A:orase#k´arva GI ;
osavuseta+A:osavuseta GI ;
oskusega+A:´oskusega GI ;
ostmata+A:´ostmata GI ;
otsustamata+A:otsustamata GI ;
@P.Case.Short@paaris+A:@P.Case.Short@p´aaris GI ;
paganama+A:paganama GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@paistes+A:@P.Case.Ine@p´aistes GI ;
pakendamata+A:pakendamata GI ;
paksuvõitu+A:paksu#v´õitu GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@palges+A:@P.Case.Ine@p´alges GI ;
panemata+A:panemata GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@pankas+A:@P.Case.Ine@p´ankas GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@paokil+A:@P.Case.Ine@p´aokil GI ;
peaga+A:p´eaga GI ;
pealesunnitud+A:p´eale#sun,nitud GI ;
peavarjuta+A:p´ea#varjuta GI ;
peenuseta+A:p´eenuseta GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@peidus+A:@P.Case.Ine@peidus GI ;
perekonnata+A:p`erekonnata GI ;
peruvõitu+A:peru#v´õitu GI ;
pesemata+A:pesemata GI ;
pesueht+A:pesu#´eht GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@pigis+A:@P.Case.Ine@pigis GI ;
piiritlemata+A:piiritlemata GI ;
pikavõitu+A:pika#v´õitu GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@pilukil+A:@P.Case.Ine@pilukil GI ;
piluli+A:piluli GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@pilves+A:@P.Case.Ine@p´ilves GI ;
pimedavõitu+A:pimeda#v´õitu GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@pinevil+A:@P.Case.Ine@pinevil GI ;
pingul+A:pingul GI ;
pinguli+A:pinguli GI ;
pinnul+A:pinnul GI ;
pisarais+A:pisarais GI ;
plussmärgiga+A:pl´uss#märgiga GI ;
pohmellis+A:pohm`el,lis GI ;
pohmeluses+A:pohmeluses GI ;
poikvel+A:p´oikvel GI ;
polüküllastamata+A:polü#küllastamata GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@pommis+A:@P.Case.Ine@p´ommis GI ;
poolkogemata+A:p´ool#kogemata GI ;
poolpurjus+A:p´ool#p´urjus GI ;
porgandikarva+A:porgandi#k´arva GI ;
porikarva+A:pori#k´arva GI ;
pragudega+A:pragudega GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@praokil+A:@P.Case.Ine@pr´aokil GI ;
pretensioonideta+A:pretensi´oonideta GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@pruntis+A:@P.Case.Ine@pr´un,tis GI ;
pruudieas+A:pruud,i#´eas GI ;
puhastverd+A:puhast#v´erd GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@puhevil+A:@P.Case.Ine@puhevil GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@puhvis+A:@P.Case.Ine@p´uhvis GI ;
puksiiris+A:puks`iiris GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@pulkas+A:@P.Case.Ine@p´ulkas GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@pulstis+A:@P.Case.Ine@pul,stis GI ;
punasevõitu+A:punase#v´õitu GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@pungas+A:@P.Case.Ine@p´ungas GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@pungis+A:@P.Case.Ine@p´ungis GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@punnis+A:@P.Case.Ine@p´un,nis GI ;
purjeis+A:p´urjeis GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@purjes+A:@P.Case.Ine@p´urjes GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@purjus+A:@P.Case.Ine@p´urjus GI ;
purupurjus+A:puru#p´urjus GI ;
puseriti+A:puseriti GI ;
puudustega+A:p´uudustega GI ;
puutumata+A:p´uutumata GI ;
põhimõteteta+A:põhi#mõteteta GI ;
põlastusväärt+A:põlastus#v´äärt GI ;
põlgusväärt+A:p´õlgus#v´äärt GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@põnevil+A:@P.Case.Ine@põnevil GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@põnnis+A:@P.Case.Ine@p´õn,nis GI ;
põrgumoodi+A:p´õrgu#m´ood,i GI ;
päikeseta+A:p´äikeseta GI ;
pärani+A:pärani GI ;
@P.Case.Short@päris+A:@P.Case.Short@päris GI ;
päriskoduta+A:päris#koduta GI ;
pöördevormita+A:p´öörde#vormita GI ;
pühade+A:pühade GI ;
püstloodi+A:p´üs,t#l´ood,i GI ;
püstloodis+A:p´üs,t#l´ood,is GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@raagus+A:@P.Case.Ine@r´aagus GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@raamas+A:@P.Case.Ine@r´aamas GI ;
rafineerimata+A:rafin´eerimata GI ;
rahaga+A:rahaga GI ;
rahata+A:rahata GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@raisus+A:@P.Case.Ine@raisus GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@rajuvil+A:@P.Case.Ine@rajuvil GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@rakkus+A:@P.Case.Ine@r´akkus GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@rangis+A:@P.Case.Ine@r´angis GI ;
raskevõitu+A:r´aske#v´õitu GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@rasvas+A:@P.Case.Ine@r´asvas GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@raudus+A:@P.Case.Ine@r´audus GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@rebevil+A:@P.Case.Ine@rebevil GI ;
redusse+A:redusse GI ;
registreerimata+A:registr´eerimata GI ;
relvadeta+A:r´elvadeta GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@relvis+A:@P.Case.Ine@relvis GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@ribevil+A:@P.Case.Ine@ribevil GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@rihtis+A:@P.Case.Ine@r´ihtis GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@riides+A:@P.Case.Ine@r´iides GI ;
riigikaitsenõukogu+A:riigi#k´aitse#n´õu#kogu GI ;
riigileival+A:riigi#leival GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@riimis+A:@P.Case.Ine@r´iimis GI ;
riius+A:riius GI ;
riketega+A:riketega GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@rikkis+A:@P.Case.Ine@r´ikkis GI ;
rikkumata+A:r´ikkumata GI ;
ringluses+A:r´ingluses GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@ripakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@ripakil GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@risakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@risakil GI ;
risa-räsa+A:risa-räsa GI ;
riskeerimata+A:risk´eerimata GI ;
riskita+A:riskita GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@ristis+A:@P.Case.Ine@r´is,tis GI ;
ristloodis+A:r´ist#l´ood,is GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@rohtus+A:@P.Case.Ine@r´ohtus GI ;
rohukarva+A:rohu#k´arva GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@roostes+A:@P.Case.Ine@r´oostes GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@rullis+A:@P.Case.Ine@r´ul,lis GI ;
ruttamata+A:r´uttamata GI ;
rõhtloodis+A:r´õht#l´ood,is GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@rõõmukil+A:@P.Case.Ine@rõõmukil GI ;
räbalais+A:räbalais GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@rähmas+A:@P.Case.Ine@r´ähmas GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@räsakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@räsakil GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@räsas+A:@P.Case.Ine@räsas GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@räämas+A:@P.Case.Ine@r´äämas GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@rööpas+A:@P.Case.Ine@r´ööpas GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@röötsakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@röötsakil GI ;
saamata+A:saamata GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@sagris+A:@P.Case.Ine@sagris GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@sakris+A:@P.Case.Ine@s´akris GI ;
salakirjas+A:sala#kir,jas GI ;
salgamata+A:s´algamata GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@salkus+A:@P.Case.Ine@s´alkus GI ;
sapisevõitu+A:sapise#v´õitu GI ;
sarvedega+A:s´arvedega GI ;
sarvedeta+A:s´arvedeta GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@sassis+A:@P.Case.Ine@s´as,sis GI ;
sedalaadi+A:seda#l´aad,i GI ;
sedasorti+A:seda#s´orti GI ;
segamini+A:segamini GI ;
segasevõitu+A:segase#v´õitu GI ;
selgroota+A:s´el,g#r´oota GI ;
selguseta+A:s´elguseta GI ;
sidrunikarva+A:sidruni#k´arva GI ;
siksakkidega+A:s´iks´akkidega GI ;
sindrima+A:s´indrima GI ;
sinepikarva+A:sinepi#k´arva GI ;
sinusorti+A:sinu#s´orti GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@sirakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@sirakil GI ;
sirelikarva+A:sireli#k´arva GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@sirevil+A:@P.Case.Ine@sirevil GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@sirukil+A:@P.Case.Ine@sirukil GI ;
sissetehtud+A:s´isse#t´ehtud GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@sompus+A:@P.Case.Ine@s´ompus GI ;
soolamata+A:s´oolamata GI ;
soolata+A:soolata GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@sopsus+A:@P.Case.Ine@s´opsus GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@sorakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@sorakil GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@sorgus+A:@P.Case.Ine@s´orgus GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@sorus+A:@P.Case.Ine@sorus GI ;
sugu+A:sugu GI ;
suikel+A:s´uikel GI ;
suitsukarva+A:suitsu#k´arva GI ;
suremas+A:suremas GI ;
suurevõitu+A:suure#v´õitu GI ;
sõitmata+A:s´õitmata GI ;
sõlmedega+A:s´õlmedega GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@sõlmes+A:@P.Case.Ine@s´õlmes GI ;
sõltumata+A:s´õltumata GI ;
sõnalausumata+A:sõna#l´ausumata GI ;
sõnaõigusega+A:sõna#´õigusega GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@sõõnas+A:@P.Case.Ine@s´õõnas GI ;
säbarais+A:säbarais GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@säbrus+A:@P.Case.Ine@säbrus GI ;
söömata+A:söömata GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@söötis+A:@P.Case.Ine@s´ööt,is GI ;
südametunnistuseta+A:südame#tun,nistuseta GI ;
sündimata+A:s´ün,dimata GI ;
süvenemata+A:süvenemata GI ;
taevakarva+A:t´aeva#k´arva GI ;
tagapõhjata+A:taga#põhjata GI ;
tahtmata+A:t´ahtmata GI ;
takistusteta+A:takistusteta GI ;
taltsutamata+A:taltsutamata GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@tangus+A:@P.Case.Ine@t´angus GI ;
tasakaalustamata+A:tasa#kaalustamata GI ;
tasumata+A:tasumata GI ;
tasuta+A:tasuta GI ;
teada+A:t´eada GI ;
teadmata+A:t´eadmata GI ;
teadvuseta+A:t´eadvuseta GI ;
teenistuses+A:teenistuses GI ;
teeskluseta+A:t´eeskluseta GI ;
tegemata+A:tegemata GI ;
tegevuseta+A:tegevuseta GI ;
teiesorti+A:teie#s´orti GI ;
teistre+A:t´eistre GI ;
temasorti+A:tema#s´orti GI ;
terasest+A:terasest GI ;
tihkevõitu+A:t´ihke#v´õitu GI ;
tiibadega+A:t´iibadega GI ;
tiibadeta+A:t´iibadeta GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@tiivakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@tiivakil GI ;
tinakarva+A:tina#k´arva GI ;
tipp-topp+A:t´ipp-t´opp GI ;
tippudega+A:t´ippudega GI ;
tolmukarva+A:tolmu#k´arva GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@tompus+A:@P.Case.Ine@t´ompus GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@tongis+A:@P.Case.Ine@t´ongis GI ;
toorevõitu+A:t´oore#v´õitu GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@torris+A:@P.Case.Ine@t´orris GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@torssis+A:@P.Case.Ine@t´orssis GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@tortis+A:@P.Case.Ine@t´ortis GI ;
toruli+A:toruli GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@tossis+A:@P.Case.Ine@t´os,sis GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@traksis+A:@P.Case.Ine@tr´aksis GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@trammis+A:@P.Case.Ine@tr´ammis GI ;
treenimata+A:tr´eenimata GI ;
triipudega+A:tr´iipudega GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@trimmis+A:@P.Case.Ine@tr´immis GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@troppis+A:@P.Case.Ine@tr´oppis GI ;
tubakakarva+A:tubaka#k´arva GI ;
tubakavärvi+A:tubaka#v´ärvi GI ;
tuhakarva+A:tuha#k´arva GI ;
tuimavõitu+A:tuima#v´õitu GI ;
tulemata+A:tulemata GI ;
tulemusteta+A:tulemusteta GI ;
tumedavõitu+A:tumeda#v´õitu GI ;
tunneteta+A:tunneteta GI ;
tuntud-teatud+A:t´untud-t´eatud GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@turris+A:@P.Case.Ine@t´urris GI ;
tursel+A:t´ursel GI ;
tuuleloogus+A:tuule#l´oogus GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@tuuris+A:@P.Case.Ine@t´uuris GI ;
tuvastamata+A:tuvastamata GI ;
tõepõhjata+A:t´õe#põhjata GI ;
